California, session 20252026, AB182.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Sections 13115 through 13117, inclusive, of the Elections Code, all of the following shall apply for the November 3, 2026, statewide general election:(a) The Veterans and Affordable Housing Bond Act of 2026 (Sections 2 and 3 of Senate Bill 417 of the 2025–26 Regular Session) shall be placed first on the ballot and shall be designated Proposition 1.(b) The Save for California’s Future Act (Assembly Constitutional Amendment 20 of the 2025–26 Regular Session) shall be placed second on the ballot and shall be designated Proposition 2.(c) The California Children’s Education and Health Care Protection Act of 2026 (Secretary of State Initiative #1993) shall be placed third on the ballot and shall be designated Proposition 3.(d) The California Fair Elections Act of 2026 (Sections 1, 2, 3, and 4.1 of Senate Bill 42 of the 2025–26 Regular Session) shall be placed fourth on the ballot and shall be designated Proposition 4.(e) Senate Constitutional Amendment 1 of the 2023–24 Regular Session shall be placed fifth on the ballot and shall be designated Proposition 5.(f) Nothing in this act affects the placement or numbering of any other measure that qualifies for the November 3, 2026, statewide general election ballot.SEC. 2.  This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order for the Secretary of State and county elections officials to implement the requirements of this act when preparing ballots and related materials for the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.